Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-348.01
Lottery by the sale of pickle cards; sources of funding; payments; restrictions.

(1) A lottery by the sale of pickle cards shall fund itself after its first year of existence and shall not receive money from any other source, including the operation of other charitable gaming activities, for the payment of prizes, unit cost, allowable expenses, any commission paid to a pickle card operator, lawful purpose donations, or any other expense associated with the operation of the lottery by the sale of pickle cards except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) A licensed organization establishing a lottery by the sale of pickle cards may finance such lottery with money from the general fund of the licensed organization during the first year of operation of the lottery by the sale of pickle cards. General fund money used to finance a lottery by the sale of pickle cards may be repaid from funds received by the lottery by the sale of pickle cards.

(3) A licensed organization may commingle funds received from the sale of pickle cards with any general operating funds of the licensed organization by means of a check drawn on the pickle card checking account or by electronic funds transfer from that account, but the burden of proof shall be on the licensed organization to demonstrate that such commingled funds are not used to make any payments associated with the operation of the lottery by the sale of pickle cards and are used for a lawful purpose.

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 49;

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 46;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 91.